Rhode Island, session 2025, SB569.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 17-19-49 of the General Laws in Chapter 17-19 entitled "Conduct of
Election and Voting Equipment, and Supplies" is hereby amended to read as follows:
17-19-49. Political literature and influence.
No poster, paper, circular, or other document designed or tending to aid, injure, or defeat
any candidate for public office or any political party on any question submitted to the voters shall
be distributed or displayed within the voting place or within fifty (50) feet of the entrance or
entrances to the building in which voting is conducted at any primary or election including both
early voting and election day voting. Neither shall any election official display on his or her person
within the voting place any political party button, badge, or other device tending to aid, injure, or
defeat the candidacy of any person for public office or any question submitted to the voters or to
intimidate or influence the voters.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001429
========